Nebraska, session 109, LB1228.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1228 LB1228
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) In addition to all other court costs assessed
according to law, a state docket fee shall be taxed as costs in each
civil cause of action or traffic misdemeanor or infraction filed in the
Supreme Court and the district courts, the county courts, and the
separate juvenile courts in the following dollar amounts:
Case Category State Docket Fee
Civil cause of action (district court or Supreme Court) 116.00
Civil cause of action (county court or separate juvenile
70.00
court)
Dissolution 111.00
Traffic misdemeanor or infraction 61.00
Small claims 38.00
(2) The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of the
month. The State Treasurer shall credit ten dollars of such fee to the
JUSTICE Software Cash Fund and the remainder to the Supreme Court
Operations Cash Fund.
(3) A county, city, or village shall not be required to pay any
state docket fee that has been deemed uncollectible for any reason.
Sec. 2. (1) The Supreme Court Operations Cash Fund is created. The
State Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall
consist of money remitted pursuant to section 1 of this act. Permissible
expenditures from the fund include, but are not limited to, supplementing
any state funds necessary to support the administrative operations of the
Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, district courts, separate juvenile
courts, county courts, and Nebraska Probation System.
(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 3. (1) The JUSTICE Software Cash Fund is created. The State
Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of
-2-

LB1228 LB1228
2026 2026
money remitted pursuant to section 1 of this act. The Supreme Court may
use the fund to aid in defraying the costs of purchasing, implementing,
and maintaining software.
(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 4. Section 29-2709, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2709 When any costs in misdemeanor, traffic, felony preliminary,
or juvenile cases in county court, except for those costs provided for in
subsection (3) of section 24-703, two dollars of the fee provided in
section 33-107.01, the court automation fee provided in section
33-107.03, and the uniform data analysis fee provided in section 47-633,
and the state docket fee provided in section 1 of this act, are found by
a county judge to be uncollectible for any reason, including the
dismissal of the case, such costs shall be deemed waived unless the
judge, in his or her discretion, enters an order assessing such portion
of the costs as by law would be paid over by the court to the State
Treasurer as follows:
(1) In all cases brought by or with the consent of the county
attorney, all such uncollectible costs shall be certified by the clerk of
the court to the county clerk who shall present the bills therefor to the
county board. The county board shall pay from the county general fund all
such bills found by the board to be lawful; and
(2) In all cases brought under city or village ordinance, all such
uncollectible costs shall be certified to the appropriate city or village
officer authorized to receive claims who shall present the bills therefor
to the governing body of the city or village in the same manner as other
claims. Such governing body shall pay from the general fund of the city
or village all such bills as are found to be lawful.
Sec. 5. Original section 29-2709, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-3-

LB1228 LB1228
2026 2026
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-